Indiana, session 2026, SB159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-20-13-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a:
(1) school corporation may not:
(A) receive any money under this chapter;
(B) use money from the school corporation's education fund
for educational technology equipment under IC 20-40-2; or
(C) receive an advance from the common school fund for an
educational technology program under IC 20-49-4; and
(2) charter school may not receive:
(A) a technology plan grant under sections 13 through 24 of
this chapter; or
(B) an advance from the common school fund for an
educational technology program under IC 20-49-4;
unless the school corporation or charter school develops a three (3)
year technology plan.
(b) Each technology plan must include at least the following
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143


information:
(1) A description of the school corporation's or charter school's
intent to integrate technology into the school corporation's or
charter school's curriculum.
(2) A plan for providing inservice training.
(3) A schedule for maintaining and replacing educational
technology equipment.
(4) A description of the criteria used to select the appropriate
educational technology equipment for the appropriate use.
(5) A description of the school corporation's or charter
school's plan to:
(A) ensure the appropriate use of technological devices in
schools; and
(B) enable parents of students to exercise control over a
student's technological devices as described in
IC 20-26-5-40.5(c) while the student is not:
(i) in school; or
(ii) engaged in virtual instruction or remote learning.
(5) (6) Other information requested by the department after
consulting with the budget agency.
(c) The department shall develop guidelines concerning the
development of technology plans. The guidelines developed under this
subsection are subject to the approval of the governor.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-5-40.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40.5. (a) Not later than January 1, 2022, Each
school corporation and charter school shall adopt and implement an
Internet use policy that:
(1) prohibits the sending, receiving, viewing, or downloading of
materials that are harmful to minors (as described in
IC 35-49-2-2) on computers and other technology related devices
owned by the school corporation or charter school;
(2) provides for the use of hardware or installation of software on
computers and other technology related devices described in
subdivision (1) to filter or block Internet access to materials that
are harmful to minors; and
(3) establishes appropriate disciplinary measures to be taken
against persons violating the policy established under this section.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2022, Each school corporation and
charter school shall use hardware or install software on computers and
other technology related devices described in subsection (a)(1) to filter
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143


or block Internet access to materials that are harmful to minors.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e), not later than January
1, 2027, each school corporation and charter school shall adopt and
implement a policy that enables the parent of a student to:
(1) increase the strength of the filter described in subsection
(b);
(2) block access to websites or content accessible on a device
described in subsection (a)(1); and
(3) limit the amount of time a device described in subsection
(a)(1) may be used by the student;
while the student is not in school or engaged in virtual instruction
or remote learning. A school to which this subsection applies must
inform each parent of a student enrolled in the school of the policy
described in this subsection.
(c) (d) Each school corporation and charter school shall post on the
school corporation's or charter school's Internet web site website the
Internet use policy established under subsection (a).
(e) A school to which this section applies that, as of June 30,
2026, has a contract with a vendor that:
(1) provides for the implementation of the requirements of
subsection (b); and
(2) cannot provide for the implementation of the requirements
of subsection (c);
is exempt from the requirements of subsection (c) until the
expiration or renewal of the contract. This subsection expires July
1, 2030.
SECTION 3. IC 20-26-5-40.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.24-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40.7. (a) As used in this section, "instructional
time" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-30-2-1.
(b) As used in this section, "wireless communication device" means
any portable wireless device that has the capability to provide voice,
messaging, or other data communication between two (2) or more
parties, including a:
(1) cellular telephone;
(2) tablet computer;
(3) laptop computer; or
(4) gaming device.
(c) Each school corporation and charter school shall adopt and
implement a wireless communication device policy that:
(1) except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) and subsection
(d), prohibits a student from using a:
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143


(A) wireless communication device during instructional time;
and
(B) school supplied wireless communication device for a
noneducational purpose during instructional time;
(2) authorizes a teacher to allow a student to use a wireless
communication device for educational purposes during
instructional time; and
(3) permits a student to use a wireless communication device in
the event of an emergency or to manage the student's health care.
(d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection (c) may
not prohibit a student from using a wireless communication device
during instructional time if the use of the wireless communication
device is included in the student's:
(1) individualized education program; or
(2) plan developed under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation
Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(e) Each school corporation and charter school shall publish on its
website the wireless communication device policy established under
subsection (c).
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Education and Career
Development, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 159, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 3, between lines 2 and 3, begin a new line block indented and
insert:
"(1) increase the strength of the filter described in subsection
(b);
(2) block access to websites or content accessible on a device
described in subsection (a)(1); and
(3) limit the amount of time a device described in subsection
(a)(1) may be used by the student while the student is not in
school.".
Page 3, delete lines 3 through 7.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 159 as introduced.)
RAATZ, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 1.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 159 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, delete lines 14 through 16, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(B) enable parents of students to exercise control over a
student's technological devices as described in
IC 20-26-5-40.5(c) while the student is not:
(i) in school; or
(ii) engaged in virtual instruction or remote learning.".
Page 2, line 42, delete "Not" and insert "Except as provided in
subsection (e), not".
Page 3, delete lines 7 through 9, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(3) limit the amount of time a device described in subsection
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143


(a)(1) may be used by the student;".
Page 3, line 10, delete "A" and insert "while the student is not in
school or engaged in virtual instruction or remote learning. A".
Page 3, between lines 15 and 16, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(e) A school to which this section applies that, as of June 30,
2026, has a contract with a vendor that:
(1) provides for the implementation of the requirements of
subsection (b); and
(2) cannot provide for the implementation of the requirements
of subsection (c);
is exempt from the requirements of subsection (c) until the
expiration or renewal of the contract. This subsection expires July
1, 2030.".
(Reference is to SB 159 as printed January 16, 2026.)
DEERY
SB 159—LS 6604/DI 143